Utah statutes.
52-4-102.   Declaration of public policy.
(1)  The Legislature finds and declares that the state, its agencies and
political subdivisions, exist to aid in the conduct of the people's business.
(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the state, its agencies, and its
political subdivisions:
(a)  take their actions openly; and
(b)  conduct their deliberations openly.
